Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 430.380 is amended to read:
430.380. (1) There is established in the General Fund of  the State Treasury an account to be
known as the Mental  Health Alcoholism and Drug Services Account. Moneys deposited in the ac-
count are continuously appropriated for the purposes of ORS 430.345 to 430.380  and  to provide
funding for  sobering facilities registered under ORS 430.262 . Moneys deposited in the account
may be invested in the manner prescribed in ORS 293.701 to 293.857.
(2) Forty  percent of the moneys in the Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug Services Account
shall be continuously appropriated to the counties on the basis of population. The  counties must use
the moneys for the establishment, operation and maintenance of  alcohol and drug abuse prevention,
early intervention and treatment services and for local matching funds under  ORS 430.345 to
430.380. The counties may use up to 10 percent of the  moneys appropriated under this sub-
section to provide funds for sobering facilities registered under ORS 430.262.
(3) Forty percent of the moneys shall be continuously appropriated to the  Oregon Health Au-
thority to be used for state  matching funds to counties for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early
intervention and treatment services  pursuant to ORS 430.345 to 430.380.  The authority may use
up to 10 percent of the moneys appropriated  under this subsection for matching funds to
counties for sobering facilities registered under ORS 430.262.
(4) Twenty percent of  the moneys shall be continuously appropriated to the Oregon Health Au-
thority to be used for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and  treatment services
for inmates of correctional and penal institutions and for parolees therefrom and for probationers
as provided pursuant to  rules of the authority. However, prior to expenditure of moneys under this
subsection, the authority must present its program plans for approval to the appropriate  legislative
body which is either the Joint Ways and Means Committee during a session of the  Legislative As-
sembly or the Emergency Board during the interim between sessions.
(5) Counties and state agencies:
(a) May not use moneys  appropriated to counties and state agencies under subsections (1) to (4)
of this section for alcohol and drug prevention and treatment services that do not  meet or exceed
minimum standards established under ORS 430.357; and
(b) Shall include in all grants and contracts  with providers of alcohol and drug prevention and
treatment services a contract provision  that the grant or contract may be terminated by the county
Enrolled House Bill 2176 (HB 2176-INTRO) Page 1
or state agency if  the provider does not meet or exceed the minimum standards adopted by the
Oregon Health Authority pursuant to ORS 430.357.  A county or state agency may not be penalized
and is not liable for the termination of a contract under this section.
SECTION 2.  ORS 430.366 is amended to read:
430.366. (1)  Every proposal for alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treat-
ment services received from an applicant shall contain:
(a) A clear statement of the  goals and objectives of the program for the following fiscal year,
including the number of persons to be served and methods of measuring the success  of services
rendered;
(b) A description of services to be funded; and
(c) A statement of the minorities to be served, if a minority program.
(2) Each grant recipient and provider of alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention
and treatment services funded with moneys from the Mental Health Alcoholism and Drug  Services
Account established by ORS 430.380 shall report to the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission  all
data regarding the services in the form  and manner prescribed by the commission.  This subsection
does not apply to sobering facilities that receive moneys under ORS 430.380.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 430.370 is amended to read:
430.370. (1) A  county may provide alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and
treatment services by contracting therefor with public or private, profit or nonprofit agencies. A
county entering into such a contract shall receive grants under ORS 430.345 to  430.380 only if the
contracting agency meets the  requirements of ORS 430.345  or is a sobering facility registered
under ORS 430.262.
(2) A city and county, or any  combination thereof, may enter into a written agreement, as pro-
vided in ORS 190.003 to 190.620, jointly to establish, operate and maintain alcohol  and drug abuse
prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
Passed by House May 3, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 24, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2176 (HB 2176-INTRO) Page 2